District of Columbia statutes.
6-1041.04

Enforcement.

(a)

(1)

A violation of this subchapter or the rules issued under authority of this subchapter shall be a civil infraction for the purposes of Chapter 18 of Title 2 and be grounds for revocation of any building permit and certificate of occupancy for the market rate portions of the Inclusionary Development.

(2)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for infraction of § 6-1041.02 or any rule promulgated under its authority pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

(b)

In addition to such fines, penalties, and fees as may be established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the following fines shall be imposed for violations of § 6-1041.02:

(1)

Any person found to have sold a inclusionary unit at a price greater than that permitted by the Mayor shall pay a fine equal to the amount by which the purchase price exceeded the price allowed plus 10%.

(2)

Any person found to have rented an inclusionary unit for a rent greater than that permitted by the Mayor shall pay a fine equal the amount by which the rent paid exceeded the rent allowed plus 10%. The fine amount shall continue to be paid until the owner provides proof satisfactory to the Mayor that the rental payment has been reduced to the maximum allowed.

(3)

All other violations of the Inclusionary Zoning Program are Class I infractions and subject to the fine schedule set forth at 16 DCMR § 3201.1, as that schedule may be amended.

(c)

All fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Housing Production Trust Fund.

(d)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may institute court proceedings to enjoin violations of the Inclusionary Zoning Program.

(e)

The District government shall not issue or reissue any license or permit, including a building permit or certificate of occupancy, to any applicant for a license or permit if the applicant is the owner of any Inclusionary Development or unit and found, after a hearing, to be in violation of the Inclusionary Zoning Program until such time as the Mayor certifies that the Inclusionary Development or unit is again in compliance.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-275, § 104, 54 DCR 880
This section is referenced in § 6-1041.07 and § 42-2802.